North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55A. North Carolina Nonprofit Corporation Act.
Part 4. Miscellaneous.

§ 55A-14-40.
Disposition of amounts due to unavailable members and creditors.

Upon liquidation of a corporation, the portion of the assets distributable to a creditor or member who is unknown or cannot be found shall be disposed of in accordance with Chapter 116B of the General Statutes.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1981, c. 682, s. 13; 1993, c. 398, s. 1.

North Carolina Commentary

This section does not bring forward the special procedures in former G.S. 55A-57 under which assets distributable to a creditor or a member who is unknown or cannot be found were deposited with the clerk of superior court for a period of three months, after which he was directed to pay such assets to the Escheat Fund.